Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5882XS (3) 91 dg/jh S.F. 2278 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âAlgorithmâ means a computational process that uses 3 a set of rules to define a sequence of operation including 4 but not limited to artificial intelligence systems and 5 facial-recognition software. 6 2. âClear and conspicuous disclosureâ means a disclosure 7 in the same medium as, and provided on, at, or near and 8 contemporaneous with every advertisement, display, image, 9 offer, or announcement of a price for which notice is required, 10 using lettering and wording that are easily visible and 11 understandable to the average consumer. 12 3. âConsumerâ means a person who is seeking or solicited 13 to purchase, lease, or receive a good or service, not for 14 resale in the ordinary course of the natural personâs trade or 15 business, but for personal, family, or household use. 16 4. âConsumer dataâ means any data that identifies or could 17 reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a specific 18 natural person or device, excluding location data. 19 5. âDynamic and surveillance pricingâ means pricing that 20 fluctuates dependent on conditions where algorithmic or 21 artificial intelligence models retrain or recalibrate on 22 information in near real-time, excluding promotional pricing 23 offers, loyalty program benefits, or other temporary discounts 24 or changes to pricing related to retention of existing 25 customers. 26 6. âElectronic shelving labelsâ means electronic and 27 wireless paper displays that present product and pricing 28 information. 29 7. âFood retail establishmentâ means a retail store that is 30 described by any of the following: 31 a. The retail store is described by all of the following: 32 (1) The retail store is over fifteen thousand square feet 33 in size. 34 (2) The retail store primarily sells household foodstuff 35 -1- LSB 5882XS (3) 91 dg/jh 1/ 9 S.F. 2278 for off-site consumption, including but not limited to fresh 1 produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, 2 canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared 3 foods. 4 (3) Other household supplies or products are considered 5 secondary to the retail storeâs primary purpose of food sales. 6 b. The retail store is described by all of the following: 7 (1) The retail store is over eighty-five thousand square 8 feet. 9 (2) At least ten percent of the retail storeâs sales 10 floor area is dedicated to the sale of nontaxable merchandise 11 including but not limited to the sale of fresh produce, meats, 12 poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, canned foods, dry 13 foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared foods. 14 8. a. âNondigital presentation of priceâ means any of the 15 following: 16 (1) A sign which offers the unit price for one or more 17 brands or sizes of a given commodity. 18 (2) A sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag, affixed to the 19 shelf upon which a commodity is displayed. 20 (3) A sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag, affixed to a 21 commodity itself. 22 b. If a single sign or tag does not provide the unit 23 price information for more than one brand or size of a given 24 commodity, then all of the following information shall be 25 provided: 26 (1) The identity of the commodity. 27 (2) The brand name. 28 (3) The quantity of the packaged commodity if more than one 29 package size per brand is displayed. 30 (4) The total sale price. 31 (5) The price per appropriate unit. 32 c. Where a sign providing unit price information for one 33 or more sizes or brands of a given commodity is used, the 34 sign shall be located centrally as close as practical to all 35 -2- LSB 5882XS (3) 91 dg/jh 2/ 9 S.F. 2278 items to which the sign refers, and the unit price information 1 displayed on the sign shall be presented in a clear, distinct, 2 and nondeceptive manner. 3 9. âPersonâ means any human being or individual. 4 10. âPersonalized algorithmic pricingâ means dynamic pricing 5 and surveillance pricing derived from or set by an algorithm 6 that uses consumer data which may vary among consumers, groups 7 of consumers, or both. 8 11. âProtected class dataâ means information about an 9 individual person or groups of people that directly, in 10 combination, or by implication identifies a characteristic 11 that is legally protected from discrimination under the 12 laws of this state or under federal law, including but not 13 limited to ethnicity, national origin, age, disability, sex, 14 sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, pregnancy 15 outcomes, and reproductive health care. 16 12. a. âSurveillance pricingâ means offering or setting 17 a customized price for a good or service for a specific 18 consumer or group of consumers, based, in whole or in part, on 19 covered information collected through electronic surveillance 20 technology. 21 b. âSurveillance pricingâ includes the use of technological 22 methods, systems, or tools, including but not limited to 23 sensors, cameras, device tracking, biometric monitoring, or 24 other forms of observation or data collection, that are capable 25 of gathering covered information about a consumerâs behavior, 26 characteristics, location, or other personal attributes, 27 whether in physical or digital environments. 28 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Prohibition against predatory 29 pricing. 30 1. A food retail establishment that knowingly advertises, 31 promotes, labels, or publishes a statement, display, image, 32 offer, or announcement that uses personalized algorithmic 33 pricing using consumer data specific to a particular consumer 34 is required to provide a clear and conspicuous disclosure to 35 -3- LSB 5882XS (3) 91 dg/jh 3/ 9 S.F. 2278 consumers that reads as follows: 1 THIS PRICE WAS SET BY AN ALGORITHM USING YOUR PERSONAL DATA. 2 2. A food retail establishment shall not use electronic 3 shelving labels or any digital shelf display technology and 4 instead shall use a nondigital presentation of price. This 5 prohibition does not limit any food retail establishment or any 6 business from providing consumers, based on previous purchase 7 history, a discount, promotional price, or loyalty program 8 benefit. 9 3. A food retail establishment shall not use electronic 10 shelving labels or any digital shelf display technology to 11 display personalized algorithmic pricing or surveillance 12 pricing. 13 4. A food retail establishment shall not collect data 14 belonging to minors under seventeen years of age and shall 15 not use such data for targeted advertising or personalized 16 algorithmic pricing. 17 5. A food retail establishment shall not use protected class 18 data in setting a price for, offering, marketing, or selling 19 any good or service if any of the following are true: 20 a. The use of that data has the effect of withholding or 21 denying any of the accommodations, advantages, or privileges 22 afforded to others. 23 b. The price for such good or service is different from the 24 price offered to other individuals or groups based in whole or 25 in part on the use of protected class data. 26 6. This section shall not apply to financial services, 27 including but not limited to financial institutions, financial 28 institution affiliates, broker-dealers, registered investment 29 advisors, and entities that provide consumer credit products 30 such as credit cards, personal loans, and mortgages. 31 7. This section shall not apply to any insurer licensed, 32 regulated, or otherwise authorized to do business in this 33 state, including any persons, agents, or affiliates acting on 34 behalf of such insurer. 35 -4- LSB 5882XS (3) 91 dg/jh 4/ 9 S.F. 2278 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Enforcement and penalties. 1 1. The attorney general shall bring an action in a court 2 of competent jurisdiction against a food retail establishment 3 believed to be in violation of this chapter. 4 2. a. The attorney general may seek an injunction against 5 a food retail establishment believed to be in violation of 6 this chapter five calendar days after serving the food retail 7 establishment notice of initiating an action under this 8 chapter. 9 b. A court may issue an injunction to enjoin and restrain a 10 food retail establishment from committing further violations of 11 this chapter without requiring proof that any person has been 12 injured or damaged. 13 3. If a court determines that a food retail establishment 14 has violated this chapter, the court may impose a civil penalty 15 of not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars for each 16 violation. Civil penalties collected under this section shall 17 be deposited into the general fund of the state. 18 4. In addition to any other remedies provided in this 19 chapter, any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter 20 is entitled to bring an action in a court of competent 21 jurisdiction. 22 5. This section shall not in any way limit rights or 23 remedies which are otherwise available under law to the 24 attorney general or any other person authorized to bring an 25 action under this chapter. 26 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Interpretation. 27 This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate 28 its purposes. Courts shall interpret the provisions of this 29 chapter in order to preserve the maximum lawful effect of this 30 chapter. 31